Missouri, session 2026, SB1058.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 262, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 262.975, to read as
follows:
262.975. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, for the purposes of chapter 89, helianthus annuus
shall not be considered an agricultural crop.
✓